Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 1 General Provisions

11-1-1.
Common law offenses not covered by statute.

Every act and omission which is an offense at common law, and for which no punishment is prescribed by the general laws, may be prosecuted and punished as an offense at common law. Every person who shall be convicted of any offense which is a misdemeanor at common law shall be imprisoned for a term not exceeding one year or be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500). Every person who shall be convicted of any offense which is a felony at common law shall be imprisoned for a term not exceeding five (5) years or be fined not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 284, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 350, § 1; P.L. 1922, ch. 2233, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 402, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 621, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-1-1

; P.L. 1975, ch. 283, § 1.

11-1-2.
Felony, misdemeanor — Petty misdemeanor, and violation distinguished.

Unless otherwise provided, any criminal offense which at any given time may be punished by imprisonment for a term of more than one year, or by a fine of more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), is declared to be a felony; any criminal offense which may be punishable by imprisonment for a term not exceeding one year, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both, is declared to be a misdemeanor; any criminal offense which may be punishable by imprisonment for a term not exceeding six (6) months or by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or both, is declared to be a petty misdemeanor; and any offense which may be punished by only a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) is declared to be a violation.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 74; P.L. 1941, ch. 983, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

11-1-2

; P.L. 1971, ch. 115, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 222, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 462, § 3.

11-1-2.1.
Violations — Effect of conviction — Standard of proof.

Conviction of a violation shall not give rise to any disability or legal disadvantage based on conviction of a criminal offense. Conviction of a violation shall be supported by evidence beyond a reasonable doubt.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 173, § 2.

11-1-3.
Liability for aiding, abetting, counseling, hiring, or commanding offenses.

Every person who shall aid, assist, abet, counsel, hire, command, or procure another to commit any crime or offense, shall be proceeded against as principal or as an accessory before the fact, according to the nature of the offense committed, and upon conviction shall suffer the like punishment as the principal offender is subject to by this title.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 284, § 2; C.P.A. 1905, § 1178; G.L. 1909, ch. 350, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 402, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 623, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-1-3

.

11-1-4.
Harboring criminal.

Except where subsection

11-37-8.2.1(d)

applies, every person not standing in the relation of husband or wife, parent or grandparent, child or grandchild, or brother or sister, by consanguinity or affinity, to another who shall have committed any offense or been accessory before the fact to the commission of any offense, who shall be convicted of knowingly harboring or relieving the offender, with intent that he or she shall escape or avoid detection, arrest, trial, or punishment, shall be imprisoned not exceeding five (5) years or be fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 284, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 350, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 402, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 622, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-1-4

; P.L. 2006, ch. 206, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 207, § 2.

11-1-5.
Compounding or concealing felony.

Every person who shall be convicted of having knowledge of the commission of any felony offense, and of taking any money, gratuity, or reward, or any engagement, upon an agreement or understanding, express or implied, to compound or conceal that crime or offense, or not to prosecute for the offense, or not to give evidence relative to the offense, shall be imprisoned not exceeding five (5) years or be fined not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), provided that the person shall not be subject to a fine or imprisonment exceeding the felony pertaining to this offense.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 276, § 20; G.L. 1909, ch. 342, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 394, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 605, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

11-1-5

; P.L. 1981, ch. 177, § 1.

11-1-5.1.
Reports of crimes to law enforcement officials.

A person who knows that another person is a victim of sexual assault, murder, manslaughter, or armed robbery and who is at the scene of the crime shall, to the extent that the person can do so without danger of peril to the person or others, report the crime to an appropriate law enforcement official as soon as reasonably practicable. Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be subject to imprisonment for a term not exceeding six (6) months, or by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 285, § 1.

11-1-6.
Conspiracy.

Except as otherwise provided by law, every person who shall conspire with another to commit an offense punishable under the laws of this state shall be subject to the same fine and imprisonment as pertain to the offense which the person shall have conspired to commit, provided that imprisonment for the conspiracy shall not exceed ten (10) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 283, § 2.

11-1-7.
Conspiracy to commit offense outside the state.

Every person who shall, within this state, conspire with another to engage in conduct in another state punishable under the laws of that state, which conduct would also be punishable under the laws of this state, shall be subject to the same fine and imprisonment as under the law of this state pertain to the offense which the person shall have conspired to commit, provided that imprisonment for the conspiracy shall not exceed ten (10) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 283, § 2.

11-1-8.
Bail jumping.

Every person accused of a felony offense who, by court order, has been released from custody or allowed to remain at liberty, either upon the person’s own recognizance or with surety or sureties, upon condition that he or she appear before the court where the felony is pending, or to which he or she may be bound over, to answer the felony whenever called upon to so do, who does not appear personally on the required date or voluntarily within thirty (30) days thereafter, or who fails to appear for any court session during the trial or on the day for sentencing, shall be guilty of a felony and upon conviction shall be subject to the same fine and imprisonment as pertain to the offense for which he or she failed to answer, provided that imprisonment for the offense shall not exceed ten (10) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 35, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 195, § 1.

11-1-9.
Soliciting another to commit a crime.

Every person who solicits another to commit or join in the commission of a felony under the laws of this state shall be guilty of a felony and upon conviction shall be subject to the same fine and imprisonment as pertain to the offense which the person did solicit another to commit, provided that imprisonment for the solicitation shall not exceed ten (10) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 245, § 1.

11-1-10.
Soliciting an incompetent person.

Every person who knowingly or willfully encourages, aids, contributes to, or in any way causes any person who as a result of mental and/or physical disability has had a guardian appointed for his or her person or estate to violate any law of this state or the ordinances of any town or city in the state, or who knowingly and willfully encourages, aids, contributes to, or in any way causes that disabled person to be guilty of any vicious or immoral conduct, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or be imprisoned for not more than one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 82, § 1.

11-1-11.
Felons prohibited from possession of radio scanners.

No person: (1) who has been convicted of a felony violation of chapter 28 of title 21 involving the illegal manufacture, sale or delivery or possession with intent to manufacture, sell, or deliver a controlled substance classified in Schedule I or II; or (2) who has been convicted of a felony in violation of chapter 8 of this title involving the burglary or breaking and entering of a dwelling house or apartment, whether the house or apartment is occupied or not, any business place, or public building, with the intent to commit larceny; shall carry, transport, or have in his or her possession, or under his or her control outside of his or her own home, any operational police radio, police scanner, or any other device capable of monitoring police broadcasts. Every person violating the provisions of this section shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 515, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 330, § 1.